Hawaii, session 2026, SB2211.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  This Act is recommended by the governor for immediate passage in accordance with section 9 of article VII of the Constitution of the State of Hawaii. SECTION 2. The legislature finds that the federal government shutdown that commenced on October 1, 2025, and ended on November 12, 2025, threatened the food security of Hawaii residents who receive supplemental nutrition assistance program benefits, as well as Hawaii's federal employees and contractors whose employment and income were disrupted.  The shutdown also delayed access to other federal grant funding.  During the shutdown, the United States Department of Agriculture, Food and Nutrition Services, issued multiple instructions to the department of human service regarding the benefit amounts and the timing of distribution for November supplemental nutrition assistance program benefits.  To fund these efforts, the department of human services redirected state fiscal year 2025‑2026 general fund appropriations from its eighteen programs and received transferred funds from the department of labor and industrial relations. To date, the department of human services has distributed Hawaii emergency food assistance program benefits to 81,399 eligible households, which includes 161,549 individuals enrolled in the supplemental nutrition assistance program.  To cover the cost for 27,406 eligible households with a dependent child totaling 101,655 individuals, the department of human services can access federal funds from the temporary assistance for needy families program. The legislature further finds that the department of human services needs an emergency appropriation in the amount of $14,248,126 in general funds to cover the amounts it paid for the response to federal shutdown, specifically: $11,807,126 for the Hawaii emergency food relief program, $2,000,000 to support the Hawaii Food Bank for purchase and distribution of food, and $441,000 to the Aloha United Way for 211 call center support. The legislature also recognizes that some Hawaii residents are facing higher premiums for health insurance purchased through the federal marketplace due to recent policies implemented by the federal government.  The legislature further finds that the department of human services needs an emergency appropriation in the amount of $16,500,000 in general funds to implement efforts to provide assistance to Hawaii residents purchasing health insurance through the federal marketplace. Therefore, the purpose of this Act is to appropriate general funds to: (1)  Replenish the remaining balance of fiscal year 2025‑2026 general fund appropriations that were redirected to support Hawaii residents' food security, enabling the department of human services to meet its existing obligations and avoid the assessment of penalties and interest; and (2)  Assist Hawaii residents with the cost of health insurance available through the federal marketplace. SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary, for fiscal year 2025-2026 to offset costs incurred by the department of human services in providing emergency food assistance to Hawaii residents during the federal government shutdown. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of human services for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to assist Hawaii residents with the cost of health insurance available through the federal marketplace. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of human services for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2050.